Maryland, session 2025, SB0465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–1410.4.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “COMMON AREA” MEANS A PLACE OF SHARED ACCESS
AVAILABLE TO RESIDENTS WHERE THERE IS NO REASONABLE EXPECTATION OF
PRIVACY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0465*

SENATE BILL 465
(II) “COMMON AREA” INCLUDES:
1. A DINING AREA;
2. A MEETING ROOM;
3. A HALLWAY;
4. A FACILITY ENTRANCE;
5. AN ACTIVITY ROOM; AND
6. A LIVING ROOM.
(3) (I) “PRIVATE SPACE” MEANS A PLACE WITHIN A NURSING
HOME IN WHICH A RESIDENT HAS A REASONABLE EXPECTATION OF PRIVACY.
(II) “PRIVATE SPACE” INCLUDES:
1. A BEDROOM;
2. A BATHROOM;
3. A PLACE WHERE A RESIDENT RECEIVES MEDICAL
CARE OR NURSING SERVICES; AND
4. A PLACE WHERE A RESIDENT MEETS PRIVATELY WITH
VISITORS.
(B) A NURSING HOME LICENSED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL INSTALL,
OPERATE, AND MAINTAIN VIDEO SURVEILLANCE EQUIPMENT IN THE COMMON
AREAS OF THE FACILITY FOR THE PURPOSE OF DETECTING THE ABUSE, NEGLECT,
OR EXPLOITATION OF RESIDENTS.
(C) A NURSING HOME SHALL ENSURE THAT THE VIDEO SURVEILLANCE
MAINTAINED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) IS CONTINUOUS AND WITHOUT INTERRUPTION;
(2) DOES NOT CAPTURE IMAGES WITHIN A PRIVATE SPACE; AND
(3) COMPLIES WITH THE FEDERAL ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATIONS
PRIVACY ACT OF 1986 AND THE MARYLAND WIRETAP ACT.

SENATE BILL 465 3
(D) (1) A NURSING HOME SHALL STORE RECORDED VIDEO MAINTAINED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION:
(I) FOR A PERIOD OF 120 DAYS AFTER THE DAY ON WHICH THE
VIDEO WAS RECORDED; AND
(II) IN A COMMON AND ACCESSIBLE FORMAT.
(2) ON REQUEST, A NURSING HOME SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE ANY
RECORDED VIDEO DATA STORED BY THE NURSING HOME TO LAW ENFORCEMENT
AND STATE PERSONNEL THAT IS NECESSARY IN THE COURSE OF PERFORMING
THEIR OFFICIAL DUTIES.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
19–1815.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “COMMON AREA” MEANS A PLACE OF SHARED ACCESS
AVAILABLE TO RESIDENTS WHERE THERE IS NO REASONABLE EXPECTATION OF
PRIVACY.
(II) “COMMON AREA” INCLUDES:
1. A DINING AREA;
2. A MEETING ROOM;
3. A HALLWAY;
4. A FACILITY ENTRANCE;
5. AN ACTIVITY ROOM; AND
6. A LIVING ROOM.
(3) (I) “PRIVATE SPACE” MEANS A PLACE WITHIN AN ASSISTED
LIVING PROGRAM FACILITY IN WHICH A RESIDENT HAS A REASONABLE
EXPECTATION OF PRIVACY.

SENATE BILL 465
(II) “PRIVATE SPACE” INCLUDES:
1. A BEDROOM;
2. A BATHROOM;
3. A PLACE WHERE A RESIDENT RECEIVES MEDICAL
CARE OR NURSING SERVICES; AND
4. A PLACE WHERE A RESIDENT MEETS PRIVATELY WITH
VISITORS.
(B) AN ASSISTED LIVING PROGRAM LICENSED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL
INSTALL, OPERATE, AND MAINTAIN VIDEO SURVEILLANCE EQUIPMENT IN THE
COMMON AREAS OF THE PROGRAM FACILITY FOR THE PURPOSE OF DETECTING THE
ABUSE, NEGLECT, OR EXPLOITATION OF RESIDENTS.
(C) AN ASSISTED LIVING PROGRAM SHALL ENSURE THAT THE VIDEO
SURVEILLANCE MAINTAINED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) IS CONTINUOUS AND WITHOUT INTERRUPTION;
(2) DOES NOT CAPTURE IMAGES WITHIN A PRIVATE SPACE; AND
(3) COMPLIES WITH THE FEDERAL ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATIONS
PRIVACY ACT OF 1986 AND THE MARYLAND WIRETAP ACT.
(D) (1) AN ASSISTED LIVING PROGRAM SHALL STORE RECORDED VIDEO
MAINTAINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION:
(I) FOR A PERIOD OF 120 DAYS AFTER THE DAY ON WHICH THE
VIDEO WAS RECORDED; AND
(II) IN A COMMON AND ACCESSIBLE FORMAT.
(2) ON REQUEST, AN ASSISTED LIVING PROGRAM SHALL MAKE
AVAILABLE ANY RECORDED VIDEO DATA STORED BY THE ASSISTED LIVING
PROGRAM TO LAW ENFORCEMENT AND STATE PERSONNEL THAT IS NECESSARY IN
THE COURSE OF PERFORMING THEIR OFFICIAL DUTIES.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.

SENATE BILL 465 5
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.